Utah statutes.
71-11-5.   Operation of homes -- Rulemaking authority -- Selection of administrator.

(1)  The department shall, subject to the approval of the executive director:

(a)  establish appropriate criteria for the admission and discharge of residents for each home, subject to the requirements in Section 71-11-6 and criteria set by the U.S. Department of Veterans' Affairs;

(b)  establish a schedule of charges for each home in cases where residents have available resources;

(c)  establish standards for the operation of the homes not inconsistent with standards set by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;

(d)  make rules to implement this chapter in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act; and

(e)  ensure that the homes are licensed in accordance with Title 26, Chapter 21, Health Care Facility Licensing and Inspection Act, and 38 U.S.C. Sec. 1742(a).

(2)  The department shall, after reviewing recommendations of the board, appoint an administrator for each home.

